Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 176.2 of Title 60, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any governmental unit that is, or has been, a beneficiary of


a multi-jurisdictional public trust established pursuant to Section


176 et seq. of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes may elect, by


resolution of its governing body, to withdraw as a beneficiary of


such trust. Upon withdrawal, the withdrawing beneficiary shall be


entitled to an equitable division of the trust’s net assets and


revenues in accordance with the laws of this state. The method,

Req. No. 2715 Page 1


timing, and amount of such division shall be determined with due


regard for the withdrawing beneficiary’s proportionate contribution,


participation, and interest in the trust. In the event the


beneficiaries or trustees are unable to agree on the distribution of


assets or revenues, such distributions shall be determined by the


district court in the county in which the trust is principally


located or operates, applying principles of equity and the laws of


this state.


B. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair the


rights of any third-party creditor, bondholder, or other person


holding a lawful obligation issued by or on behalf of the trust.


C. The requirements of this section shall apply to all public


trusts created prior to, on, or after the effective date of this


act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2715 TEK 1/13/2026 12:47:18 PM















Req. No. 2715 Page 2